Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.040

Agency's duties—Rules—Investigations—Interagency agreements about degree and nondegree programs.

The agency:

(1) Shall maintain a list of private vocational schools licensed under this chapter;

(2) Shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to carry out this chapter;

(3) May investigate any entity the agency reasonably believes to be subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter. In connection with the investigation, the agency may administer oaths and affirmations, issue subpoenas and compel attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memorandums, or other records which the agency deems relevant or material to the investigation. The agency, including its staff and any other authorized persons, may conduct site inspections and examine records of all schools subject to this chapter;

(4) Shall develop an interagency agreement with the student achievement council to regulate degree-granting private vocational schools with respect to degree and nondegree programs.

[ 2012 c 229 s 577; 1994 c 38 s 5; 1986 c 299 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.